Utah statutes.
7-1-605.   Savings accounts -- Special terms to be in writing.
Any special terms and provisions applicable to a savings account, the
ownership of a savings account, or the conditions upon which withdrawals may
be made, or all of those, shall be clearly and truthfully set forth in
writing. The provisions appearing on a signature card or in rules and
regulations for the account shall satisfy the foregoing requirements of this
section.
